New Jersey, session 222, A563.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 4 of P.L.2018, c.6 (C.19:31-6.14) is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  Any State agency, except for the Motor Vehicle Commission, that the Secretary of State verifies already collects documents that would provide proof of eligibility, including age, citizenship, and residence address, may establish and implement, upon approval by the Secretary of State, a procedure for automatically and electronically transmitting voter registration information to the Secretary of State of persons who are eligible to vote for the purpose of registering such persons to vote or updating their voter registration.  Each person from whom such information is collected shall be offered an opportunity to decline automatic voter registration.  Any such agency shall comply with the requirements, to the extent applicable as determined by the Secretary of State, as established in subsections b. through d. of section 24 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.39:2-3.2). b.    Any additional agencies that are designated for automatic voter registration shall comply with the requirements, to the extent applicable as determined by the Secretary of State, as established in section 24 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.39:2-3.2) for automatic voter registration and shall provide the notices required pursuant to subsection c. thereof to each person from whom such information is collected. c.  Notwithstanding the provisions of the section to the contrary, any agency or office providing hunting, fishing, or trapping licenses under the Division of Fish and Wildlife in the Department of Environmental Protection, established pursuant to P.L.1999, c.282 (C.23:2B-15.1), and that the Secretary of State verifies already collects documents that would provide proof of eligibility, including age, citizenship, and residence address, shall establish and implement, upon approval by the Secretary of State, a procedure for automatically and electronically transmitting voter registration information to the Secretary of State of persons who are eligible to vote for the purpose of registering such persons to vote or updating their voter registration.  Each person from whom such information is collected shall be offered an opportunity to decline automatic voter registration.  An agency or office implementing the provisions of this subsection shall comply with the requirements, to the extent applicable as determined by the Secretary of State, for automatic voter registration as established in subsections b. through d. of section 24 of P.L.1994, c.182 (C.39:2-3.2), including the provision of the notices required pursuant to subsection c. thereof to each person from whom voter registration information is collected. (cf: P.L.2018, c.6, s.4) 2.  This act shall take effect on January 1 next following the date of enactment, but the Secretary of State may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.